Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 6 Electronic Balloting

Effective date. —

This part became effective April 2, 2019.

Law reviews.

For article on the 2019 enactment of this part, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).

21-2-379.21.
Access to optical scanning voting systems for disabled.

Each polling place in this state utilizing optical scanning voting systems shall be equipped with at least one electronic ballot marker that meets the requirements as set forth in this part that is accessible to individuals with disabilities.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 26/HB 316.

21-2-379.22.
Requirements for electronic ballot marking.

No electronic ballot marker shall be adopted or used in primaries or elections in this state unless it shall, at the time, satisfy the following requirements:

Provide facilities for marking ballots for all candidates and for all referendums or questions for which the elector shall be entitled to vote in a primary or election;

Permit each elector, in one operation, to mark a vote for presidential electors for all the candidates of one party or body for the office of presidential elector;

Permit each elector to mark votes, at any election, for any person and for any office for whom and for which he or she is lawfully entitled to vote, whether or not the name of such person or persons appears as a candidate for election; to mark votes for as many persons for an office as he or she is entitled to vote for; and to mark votes for or against any question upon which he or she is entitled to vote;

Preclude the marking of votes for any candidate or upon any question for whom or upon which an elector is not entitled to vote; preclude the marking of votes for more persons for any office than the elector is entitled to vote for; and preclude the marking of votes for any candidate for the same office or upon any question more than once;

Permit voting in absolute secrecy so that no person can see or know any other elector’s votes, except when he or she has assisted the elector in voting, as prescribed by law;

Produce a paper ballot which is marked with the elector’s choices in a format readable by the elector;

Be constructed of good quality material in a neat and workmanlike manner;

When properly operated, mark correctly and accurately every vote cast;

Be so constructed that an elector may readily learn the method of operating it; and

Be safely transportable.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.22

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 26/HB 316.

21-2-379.23.
Requirements for ballot display; role of Secretary of State; printed paper ballot controls during recount; name and designation of precinct on ballot.

The ballot display information and appearance on an electronic ballot marker shall conform as nearly as practicable to Code Sections 21-2-379.4 and 21-2-379.5.

The form and arrangement of ballots marked and printed by an electronic ballot marker shall be prescribed by the Secretary of State.

Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, ballots marked and printed by an electronic ballot marker shall, at a minimum, contain:

The words “OFFICIAL BALLOT”;

The name and date of the election;

The titles of the respective offices for which the elector is eligible to vote;

Words identifying the proposed constitutional amendments or other questions for which the elector is eligible to vote;

The name of the candidate and, for partisan offices, indication of the candidate’s political party or political body affiliation, or the answer to the proposed constitutional amendment or other question for which the elector intends to vote; and

Clear indication that the elector has not marked a vote for any particular office, constitutional amendment, or other question.

The paper ballot marked and printed by the electronic ballot marker shall constitute the official ballot and shall be used for, and govern the result in, any recount conducted pursuant to Code Section 21-2-495 and any audit conducted pursuant to Code Section 21-2-498.

Each ballot printed by an electronic ballot marker shall include the name and designation of the precinct at the top.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.23

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 26/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 23A/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, added subsection (e).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-379.24.
Examination of electronic ballot markers; revocation of approval; penalty to vendors for inappropriate sale; improvements or changes to devices; prohibition on pecuniary interest; limitation on public inspection.

Any person or organization owning, manufacturing, or selling, or being interested in the manufacture or sale of, any electronic ballot marker may request that the Secretary of State examine the device. Any ten or more electors of this state may, at any time, request that the Secretary of State reexamine any such device previously examined and approved by him or her. Before any such examination or reexamination, the person, persons, or organization requesting such examination or reexamination shall pay to the Secretary of State the reasonable expenses of such examination or reexamination. The Secretary of State shall publish and maintain on his or her website the cost of such examination or reexamination. The Secretary of State may, at any time, in his or her discretion, reexamine any such device.

The Secretary of State shall thereupon examine or reexamine such device and shall make and file in his or her office a report, attested by his or her signature and the seal of his or her office, stating whether, in his or her opinion, the kind of device so examined can be safely and accurately used by electors at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter. If this report states that the device can be so used, the device shall be deemed approved, and devices of its kind may be adopted for use at primaries and elections as provided in this chapter.

Any device that is not so approved shall not be used at any primary or election and if, upon reexamination, a previously approved device appears to be no longer safe or accurate for use by electors at primaries or elections as provided in this chapter because of an inability to accurately record votes, the approval of the same shall immediately be revoked by the Secretary of State, and no such device shall thereafter be used or purchased for use in this state.

Any vendor who completes a sale of an electronic ballot marker that has not been certified by the Secretary of State to a governmental body in this state shall be subject to a penalty of $100,000.00, payable to the State of Georgia, plus reimbursement of all costs and expenses incurred by the governmental body in connection with the sale. The State Election Board shall have the authority to impose such penalty upon a finding that such a sale has occurred.

When a device has been so approved, no improvement or change that does not impair its accuracy, efficiency, or capacity shall render necessary a reexamination or reapproval of such device, or of its kind.

Neither the Secretary of State, nor any custodian, nor the governing authority of any county or municipality or a member of such governing authority nor any other person involved in the examination process shall have any pecuniary interest in any device or in the manufacture or sale thereof.

Documents or information that, if made public, would endanger the security of any voting system used or being considered for use in this state, or any component thereof, including, but not limited to, electronic ballot markers, DREs, ballot scanners, pollbooks, and software or data bases used for voter registration, shall not be open for public inspection except upon order of a court of competent jurisdiction.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.24

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 26/HB 316.

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2019, “data bases” was substituted for “databases” in subsection (g).

21-2-379.25.
Programming for ballot design and style; verification; appointment of custodians; role of custodians; testing of electronic ballot marker; public notice of testing.

The superintendent of each county or municipality shall cause the proper ballot design and style to be programmed for each electronic ballot marker which is to be used in any precinct within such county or municipality, shall cause each such device to be placed in proper order for voting, and shall examine each device before it is sent to a polling place for use in a primary or election, to verify that each device is properly recording votes and producing proper ballots.

The superintendent may appoint, with the approval of the county or municipal governing authority, as appropriate, a custodian of the electronic ballot markers, and deputy custodians as may be necessary, whose duty shall be to prepare the devices to be used in the county or municipality at the primaries and elections to be held therein. Each custodian and deputy custodian shall receive from the county or municipality such compensation as shall be fixed by the governing authority of such county or municipality. Such custodian shall, under the direction of the superintendent, have charge of and represent the superintendent during the preparation of the devices as required by this chapter. The custodian and deputy custodians shall serve at the pleasure of the superintendent and each shall take an oath of office prepared by the Secretary of State before each primary or election, which shall be filed with the superintendent.

On or before the third day preceding a primary or election, including special primaries, special elections, and referendum elections, the superintendent shall have each electronic ballot marker tested to ascertain that it will correctly record the votes cast for all offices and on all questions and produce a ballot reflecting such choices of the elector in a manner that the State Election Board shall prescribe by rule or regulation. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall be made at least five days prior thereto. The superintendent of each county or municipality shall publish such notice on the homepage of the county’s or municipality’s publicly accessible website associated with elections, if the county or municipality maintains a publicly accessible website, and in a newspaper of general circulation in the county or municipality and by posting in a prominent location in the county or municipality. Such notice shall state the date, time, and place or places where preparation and testing of the voting system components for use in the primary or election will commence, that such preparation and testing shall continue from day to day until complete, and that representatives of political parties and bodies, news media, and the public shall be permitted to observe such tests. The superintendent of the county or municipality shall also provide such notice to the Secretary of State who shall publish on his or her website the information received from superintendents stating the dates, times, and locations for preparation and testing of voting system components. However, such representatives of political parties and bodies, news media, and the public shall not in any manner interfere with the preparation and testing of voting system components. The advertisement in the newspaper of general circulation shall be prominently displayed, shall not be less than 30 square inches, and shall not be placed in the section of the newspaper where legal notices appear.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.25

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 26/HB 316; Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 24/SB 202.

The 2021 amendment,

effective March 25, 2021, rewrote subsection (c), which read: “On or before the third day preceding a primary or election, including special primaries, special elections, and referendum elections, the superintendent shall have each electronic ballot marker tested to ascertain that it will correctly record the votes cast for all offices and on all questions and produce a ballot reflecting such choices of the elector in a manner that the State Election Board shall prescribe by rule or regulation. Public notice of the time and place of the test shall be made at least five days prior thereto; provided, however, that, in the case of a runoff, the public notice shall be made at least three days prior thereto. Representatives of political parties and bodies, news media, and the public shall be permitted to observe such tests.”

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 1/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Election Integrity Act of 2021.”’

Ga. L. 2021, p. 14, § 2/SB 202, not codified by the General Assembly, provides: “The General Assembly finds and declares that:

“(1) Following the 2018 and 2020 elections, there was a significant lack of confidence in Georgia election systems, with many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter suppression and many electors concerned about allegations of rampant voter fraud;

“(2) Many Georgia election processes were challenged in court, including the subjective signature-matching requirements, by Georgians on all sides of the political spectrum before and after the 2020 general election;

“(3) The stress of the 2020 elections, with a dramatic increase in absentee-by-mail ballots and pandemic restrictions, demonstrated where there were opportunities to update existing processes to reduce the burden on election officials and boost voter confidence;

“(4) The changes made in this legislation in 2021 are designed to address the lack of elector confidence in the election system on all sides of the political spectrum, to reduce the burden on election officials, and to streamline the process of conducting elections in Georgia by promoting uniformity in voting. Several examples will help explain how these goals are achieved;

“(5) The broad discretion allowed to local officials for advance voting dates and hours led to significant variations across the state in total number of hours of advance voting, depending on the county. More than 100 counties have never offered voting on Sunday and many counties offered only a single day of weekend voting. Requiring two Saturday voting days and two optional Sunday voting days will dramatically increase the total voting hours for voters across the State of Georgia, and all electors in Georgia will have access to multiple opportunities to vote in person on the weekend for the first time;

“(6) Some counties in 2020 received significant infusions of grant funding for election operations, while other counties received no such funds. Promoting uniformity in the distribution of funds to election operations will boost voter confidence and ensure that there is no political advantage conferred by preferring certain counties over others in the distribution of funds;

“(7) Elections in Georgia are administered by counties, but that can lead to problems for voters in counties with dysfunctional election systems. Counties with long-term problems of lines, problems with processing of absentee ballots, and other challenges in administration need accountability, but state officials are limited in what they are able to do to address those problems. Ensuring there is a mechanism to address local election problems will promote voter confidence and meet the goal of uniformity;

“(8) Elections are a public process and public participation is encouraged by all involved, but the enthusiasm of some outside groups in sending multiple absentee ballot applications in 2020, often with incorrectly filled-in voter information, led to significant confusion by electors. Clarifying the rules regarding absentee ballot applications will build elector confidence while not sacrificing the opportunities for electors to participate in the process;

“(9) The lengthy absentee ballot process also led to elector confusion, including electors who were told they had already voted when they arrived to vote in person. Creating a definite period of absentee voting will assist electors in understanding the election process while also ensuring that opportunities to vote are not diminished, especially when many absentee ballots issued in the last few days before the election were not successfully voted or were returned late;

“(10) Opportunities for delivering absentee ballots to a drop box were first created by the State Election Board as a pandemic response. The drop boxes created by rule no longer existed in Georgia law when the emergency rules that created them expired. The General Assembly considered a variety of options and constructed a system that allows the use of drop boxes, while also ensuring the security of the system and providing options in emergency situations;

“(11) The lengthy nine-week runoffs in 2020 were exhausting for candidates, donors, and electors. By adding ranked choice voting for military and overseas voters, the run-off period can be shortened to a more manageable period for all involved, easing the burden on election officials and on electors;

“(12) Counting absentee ballots in 2020 took an incredibly long time in some counties. Creating processes for early processing and scanning of absentee ballots will promote elector confidence by ensuring that results are reported quickly;

“(13) The sanctity of the precinct was also brought into sharp focus in 2020, with many groups approaching electors while they waited in line. Protecting electors from improper interference, political pressure, or intimidation while waiting in line to vote is of paramount importance to protecting the election system and ensuring elector confidence;

“(14) Ballot duplication for provisional ballots and other purposes places a heavy burden on election officials. The number of duplicated ballots has continued to rise dramatically from 2016 through 2020. Reducing the number of duplicated ballots will significantly reduce the burden on election officials and creating bipartisan panels to conduct duplication will promote elector confidence;

“(15) Electors voting out of precinct add to the burden on election officials and lines for other electors because of the length of time it takes to process a provisional ballot in a precinct. Electors should be directed to the correct precinct on election day to ensure that they are able to vote in all elections for which they are eligible;

“(16) In considering the changes in 2021, the General Assembly heard hours of testimony from electors, election officials, and attorneys involved in voting. The General Assembly made significant modifications through the legislative process as it weighed the various interests involved, including adding further weekend voting, changing parameters for out-of-precinct voting, and adding transparency for ballot images; and

“(17) While each of the changes in this legislation in 2021 stands alone and is severable under Code Section 1-1-3, the changes in total reflect the General Assembly’s considered judgment on the changes required to Georgia’s election system to make it ‘easy to vote and hard to cheat,’ applying the lessons learned from conducting an election in the 2020 pandemic.”

Law reviews.

For article, “SB 202: Revisions to Georgia’s Election and Voting Procedures,” see 38 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 105 (2021).

21-2-379.26.
Storage of equipment.

All electronic ballot markers and related equipment, when not in use, shall be properly stored and secured under conditions as shall be specified by the Secretary of State.

The superintendent shall store the devices and related equipment under his or her supervision or shall designate another person or entity to provide secure storage of such devices and related equipment when it is not in use at a primary or election. The superintendent shall provide compensation for the safe storage and care of such devices and related equipment if the devices and related equipment are stored by another person or entity.

History.

Code 1981, §

21-2-379.26

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 26/HB 316.